Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 3. Registered Office and Agent.

§ 13.1-1220.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each domestic business trust and each foreign business trust registered pursuant to Article 9 (§

13.1-1241

et seq.) of this chapter shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who shall be either:

An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and is either (i) a trustee or officer of the business trust, (ii) an officer or director of a corporation that is a trustee of the business trust, (iii) a general partner of a general or limited partnership that is a trustee of the business trust, (iv) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a trustee of the business trust, (v) a trustee of a business trust or other trust that is a trustee of the business trust, or (vi) a member of the Virginia State Bar, and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership or business trust authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the domestic business trust or the foreign business trust at its last known address any process, notice or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Cross references.

As to registration of foreign business trust, see §

13.1-1242

.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-1221.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A business trust or a foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the business trust or foreign business trust;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the domestic or foreign business trust will be in compliance with the requirements of §

13.1-1220

.

A statement of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a domestic or foreign business trust whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

13.1-1220

.

A domestic or foreign business trust’s registered agent may sign a statement as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of a registered agent has been legally changed. A domestic or foreign business trust’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

13.1-1220

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement shall be mailed to the principal office address of the domestic or foreign business trust on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2003, c. 597; 2010, c. 434.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597, effective October 1, 2003, rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change the address of the registered office of any business trust or foreign business trust of which he is a registered agent by filing a statement as required above except that it need be signed, either manually or in facsimile, only by the registered agent and shall recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to the business trust.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “to transact business in the Commonwealth” for “pursuant to Article 9 (§

13.1-1241

et seq.) of this chapter,” “filing with the” for “filing in the office of the,” and “prescribed and furnished” for “supplied”; substituted “domestic” for “business trust” in subdivision A 6; in subsection B, substituted “filed with the Commission be a domestic or foreign” for “filed in the office of the Commission be a business trust or a foreign” and deleted “registered pursuant to Article 9 (§

13.1-1241

et seq.) of this chapter”; and rewrote subsection C.

§ 13.1-1222.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the domestic or foreign business trust by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the business trust or foreign business trust, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the domestic or foreign business trust. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the domestic or foreign business trust by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change in accordance with §

13.1-1221

to appoint a registered agent is filed with the Commission.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2010, c. 434; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “resign the agency” for “resign his agency,” “by a certification that the registered agent she mail” for “by his certification that he has mailed,” “domestic” for “business trust,” inserted “on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed” and substituted “of resignation may include” for “may also include.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which read: “A. A registered agent may resign the agency appointment by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation accompanied by a certification that the registered agent shall mail a copy thereof by certified mail to the principal office of the domestic or foreign business trust on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued.

“B. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1223.
Service on business trust.

A domestic or foreign business trust’s registered agent is the business trust’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the business trust. The registered agent may, by instrument in writing and acknowledged before a notary public, designate a person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served. Whenever any such person accepts service of process, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a domestic or foreign business trust fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the business trust upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a domestic or foreign business trust.

History.

2002, c. 621.